Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20168-2609.01
Protected consumer; consumer reporting agency; fee authorized; exceptions.

(1) A consumer reporting agency may charge a fee of three dollars for each placement or removal of a security freeze for a protected consumer.

(2) A consumer reporting agency shall not charge any fee under this section if:

(a)(i) The protected consumer is a victim of identity theft; and

(ii) The protected consumer’s representative provides the consumer reporting agency with a copy of an official police report documenting the identity theft; or

(b)(i) A request for the placement or removal of a security freeze is for a protected consumer who is under the age of sixteen years at the time of the request; and

(ii) The consumer reporting agency has a credit report pertaining to the protected consumer.

Laws 2016, LB835, § 13.
January 1, 2017